Tennessee, session 114, SB1341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 42-5-204(a), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting "thirty (30) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1341
003018
- 1 -